Utah statutes.
10-5-116.   Transfer of unencumbered appropriation balance.

The council may reduce or transfer any unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balance or portion thereof from one department in a fund to another within the same fund, but no appropriation for debt retirement and interest, reduction of deficit, or other appropriation required by law or ordinance shall be reduced below the minimums required.

